Utah statutes.
17-18a-501.   Duties as civil counsel.

The attorney shall:

(1)  appear in, prosecute, and defend each civil action in which the county is a party;

(2)  prosecute, either directly or through a private contract for debt collection, each action for the recovery of debts, fines, penalties, and forfeitures accruing to the county;

(3)  prosecute each appeal regarding a civil counsel's duties or functions in which the county is a party;

(4)  act as the civil legal advisor to the county; and

(5)  attend the meetings and hearings of the county legislative body as necessary.



Enacted by Chapter 237, 2013 General Session

